backend/packages/data/src/__tests__/fixtures/czech-hunspell/cs_cz.affix
# Test-only subset of the hunspell-cs (cs_CZ) affix file: the feminine -a noun
# declension rules of its "Z" flag, enough to prove inflected forms lemmatize.
SET UTF-8

SFX Z Y 7
SFX Z   a           y          [^aeiouyžščřcjďťň]a
SFX Z   ra          ře         [^r]ra
SFX Z   a           u          a
SFX Z   a           ou         a
SFX Z   a           ám         a
SFX Z   a           ách        a
SFX Z   0           mi         a
